Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 17. Causes of Actions and Breach of Contract

§ 1001.
Causes of action abolished.

The rights of action to recover sums of money as damages for alienation of affections, criminal conversation, seduction, or breach of contract to marry are abolished.
No act done within this State shall operate to give rise, either within or outside this State, to any such right of action.
No contract to marry made or entered into in this State shall operate to give rise, either within or outside this State, to any cause or right of action for its breach.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.).

§ 1002.
Gifts made in contemplation of civil marriage.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to bar a right of action for the recovery of a chattel, the return of money or securities, or the value thereof at the time of the transfer, or the rescission of a deed to real property when the sole consideration for the transfer of the chattel, money, or securities or real property was a contemplated civil marriage that has not occurred, and the court may, if in its discretion justice so requires:

award the defendant a lien upon the chattel, securities or real property for monies expended in connection therewith or improvements made thereto; or

deny judgment for the recovery of the chattel or securities or for rescission of the deed and award money damages in lieu thereof.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.); amended

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.

Particular cases.

In a partition action, the trial court did not err in not crediting defendant’s argument that the property transfer was made in contemplation of marriage. The trial court credited plaintiff’s conflicting testimony that defendant transferred the property into joint names based on the expectation that plaintiff and her family would be contributing time and money to the construction of a home on the property, and concluded that the evidence did not support defendant’s position. Nystrom v. Hafford, 2012 VT 60, 192 Vt. 300, 59 A.3d 736, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 59 (2012).

§ 1003.
Instruments void.

Any contract or instrument executed after July 1, 1974 within this State in payment, satisfaction, settlement, or compromise of any claim or cause of action abolished by this chapter, whether such claim or cause of action arose within or outside this State, is contrary to the public policy of this State and absolutely void.
Nothing in this section shall affect the rights of parties to settle or compromise any suit duly begun or pending on July 1, 1974.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.).